Washington statutes.
RCW 19.30.020

License required—Duplicates.

No person shall act as a farm labor contractor until a license to do so has been issued to him or her by the director, and unless such license is in full force and effect and is in the contractor's possession. The director shall, by regulation, provide a means of issuing duplicate licenses in case of loss of the original license or any other appropriate instances. The director shall issue, on a monthly basis, a list of currently licensed farm labor contractors.

[ 1985 c 280 s 2; 1955 c 392 s 2.]